Rhode Island, session 2025, SB668.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 167
STATE-OWNED AND OPERATED PRINTING FACILITIES PREFERENCE ACT
42-167-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “State-Owned and Operated Printing
Facilities Preference”.
42-167-2. Use of state-owned/operated printing facilities.
Any state agency, state institution of higher education, and quasi-public agency which
engages in the printing of more than fifty (50) copies of a contract, publication, brochure, mail
piece, notice, and/or promotional material shall, when practicable, use an existing state-
owned/operated print shop/facility as long as said state-owned/operated print shop/facility is
capable of processing and manufacturing the aforementioned materials.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002325/SUB A
========